dictionaries/lv_LV/lv_LV.dic
aizklīst/FEB2458-J po:darbv15t
aizkopēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
aizlidināt/FDB2357J- po:darbv31t
aizlūžņot/HDB1357Jhdb!+&j- po:darbv22t
aizpīt/9EB%35^J(eb- po:darbv11t
aizrakt/FDB0358Jfdb)+-& po:darbv13t
aizsnigt/FDB0358J- po:darbv12t
aizšķīst/FEB2458-J po:darbv15t
aiztīstīt/FDB2357J- po:darb32t
aiztīt/9EB%35^J(eb+-* po:darbv11t
aizvizināt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darbv31t
apbīdelēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
apdegt/8DB035JA- po:darbv14t
apdzīt/GIB3%^5J- po:darbv15t
apgleznot/HDB1357Jhdb!+&j- po:darbv22t
apklidzināt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darbv31t
apkniebt/7DB135J9- po:darbv14t
apkrimst/FEC2458J- po:darbv12t
apnievāt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv21t
appīt/9EB%35^J(eb+-* po:darbv11t
appūst/8HEB145J- po:darbv14t
appūt/FEB2358-J po:darbv15t
apsildīt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darb32t
apskrest/{^ po:darbv15d
apspraust/8EB045J9- po:darbv14t
apsudrabot/HDB1357Jhdb!+&j- po:darbv22t
apšķaudīt/FDB2357J- po:darb32t
apšķīt/9EB%35^J- po:darbv11t
aptīt/9EB%35^J(eb+-* po:darbv11t
apvelt/8EB035ebJ9()+-* po:darbv14t
art/7DB135dbJ9+-& po:darbv14t
atbruņot/HDB1357Jhdb!+&j- po:darbv22t
atčāpot/HDB1357J- po:darbv22t
atdurt/8EB135ebJ9(+-* po:darbv14t
atkašņāt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv21t
atkodēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
atķīlāt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv21t
atliet/AEB0358Jeb)+-* po:darbv11t
atpazīt/GEB2358%geb-Jj*+^ po:darbv15t
atpīt/9EB%35^J(eb+-* po:darbv11t
atriest/7HDC135J- po:darbv14t
atrunāt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv21t
atsaukt/EB0358ebJ9(+-&j po:darbv14t
atsmīnēt/FDB2357J- po:darbv33t
atsust/HEB0458J- po:darbv13t
attaurēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
attīt/9EB%35^J(eb+-*j po:darbv11t
atvaicāt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv21t
atzīt/GEB2358%Jgeb-*+^j po:darbv15t
atžvadzēt/FDB2357J- po:darbv33t
augstdzimis/6- po:darbv15t
aut/8EB13J9- po:darbv14t
boikotēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
brīkšķināt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darbv31t
dearomatizēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
dīkt/8EB035J9- po:darbv14t
dramatizēt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv24t
dzijis/6-
etiolēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
gavilēt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv24t
graut/8EB135ebJ9(+*- po:darbv14t
grauzt/7DB135dbJ9(+-& po:darbv14t
iebrūnēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
iedozēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
iedzirkstēt/FDB2357Jfdb+&j- po:darbv33t
ieilgt/HDB2358-J po:darbv15t
iekņudināt/FDB2357J- po:darbv31t
iekūpināt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darbv31t
ielauzt/7DB135dbJ9(+-&j po:darbv14t
iemaut/8EB135J9- po:darbv14t
iepīt/9EB%35^J(eb+-* po:darbv11t
ierakstīt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darb32t
ierasot/HDB1357J- po:darbv22t
iesākt/ADB1358Jadb+-& po:darbv11t
iesijāt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv21t
iestigt/FDB0358J- po:darbv12t
iešķaudīt/FDB2357J- po:darb32t
ietempt/7DB135J9- po:darbv14t
ietīt/9EB%35^J(eb+-* po:darbv11t
ietriekt/8EB035ebJ9()+-& po:darbv14t
ievilt/8EB035bJ9)+- po:darbv14t
intonēt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv24t
izbīdīt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darb32t
izbraukt/7EB035J9- po:darbv14t
izdūkt/8EB035ebJ9()+-& po:darbv14t
izgāgāt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv21t
izgulēt/FDB2357Jfdb+&j- po:darbv33t
izkāst/7HDC135hdcJ-& po:darbv14t
izlāsot/HDB1357J- po:darbv22t
izlemt/8EB035J9- po:darbv14t
izlīkumot/HDB1357Jhdb!+&j- po:darbv22t
izoderēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
izpīt/9EB%35^J(eb+-* po:darbv11t
izprast/AEB0458Jaeb)$-* po:darbv13t
izpurpināt/FDB2357J- po:darbv31t
izrakt/FDB0358Jfdb)+-& po:darbv13t
izspļaut/9EB1358- po:darbv14t
izsprēgāt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv21t
izsvepstēt/FDB2357J- po:darbv33t
izšķīt/9EB%35^J- po:darbv11t
izšļākt/8EB035ebJ9()+-& po:darbv14t
iztīt/9EB%35^J(eb+-* po:darbv11t
iztrīt/9BE%35(be^J- po:darbv11t
izvelt/8EB035ebJ9()+-* po:darbv14t
izžļurkstēt/FDB2357J- po:darbv33t
jāt/7DB135dbJ9(+-&.,
jaundzimis/6-
kalibrēt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv24t
krākt/8EB035ebJ9()+-& po:darbv14t
kraut/8EB135ebJ9(+*- po:darbv14t
kricelēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
kūleņot/HDB1357Jhdb!+&j- po:darbv22t
mašinizēt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv24t
materializēt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv24t
mētāt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv21t
migt/FDB0358J- po:darbv12t
nobēdzināt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darbv31t
nobrēkāt/HDB15(db!+&j- po:darbv21t
nočukstēt/FDB2357J- po:darbv33t
nodiet/IB^35%JA- po:darbv14t
nogrābāt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv21t
nogult/FEB02357feb-*J+j po:darbv15t
noklabināt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darbv31t
nolakt/FDB0358Jfdb)+-& po:darbv13t
nolēkt/8EB135JA- po:darbv14t
nolemt/8EB035J9- po:darbv14t
nomīt/09EB%35^Jeb-Aa po:darbv11t
nomurmulēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
nopīt/9EB%35^J(eb+-* po:darbv11t
norāpt/{d(b&!+%j- po:darbv14a
noskrest/{^ po:darbv15d
noskumdināt/FDB2357J- po:darbv31t
nospļaut/9EB1358J(eb!+*- po:darbv14t
nosprauslāt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv21t
nostrupināt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darbv31t
nošķīt/9EB%35^J- po:darbv11t
notirpt/HDB2357J- po:darbv15t
notīt/9EB%35^J(eb+-* po:darbv11t
notrīt/9BE%35(be^J- po:darbv11t
novilināt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darbv31t
pablēt/7DB135J9- po:darbv14t
pabrēkāt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv21t
pabriest/FEB2458-J po:darbv15t
padiņģēt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv24t
paīrēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
pakurināt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darbv31t
palīkņāt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv21t
pamalt/7DB035J9- po:darbv14t
panākt/AEB1358Jaeb+-&j po:darbv11t
papīt/9EB%35^J(eb+-* po:darbv11t
papriecēt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv24t
pārbāzt/7DB135J9- po:darbv14t
pārdiet/IB^35%JA- po:darbv14t
pārfraktēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
pārkaist/FDC2357-J po:darbv15t
pārkrist/HEB0458Jheb$-* po:darbv13t
pārmocīt/FDB2357Jfdb+&j- po:darb32t
pārpampt/FDB2357-J po:darbv15t
pārpīt/9EB%35^J(eb- po:darbv11t
pārrobežot/HDB1357J- po:darbv22t
pārspriest/8EB045J9- po:darbv14t
pārsutināt/FDB2357J- po:darbv31t
pāršķīt/9EB%35^J- po:darbv11t
pārtīt/9EB%35^J(eb+-* po:darbv11t
pārtrīt/9BE%35(be^J+- po:darbv11t
pasaldināt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darbv31t
paslapēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
pasmelgt/8EB035J9- po:darbv14t
pašķīt/9EB%35^J- po:darbv11t
patīt/9EB%35^J(eb+-* po:darbv11t
patrīt/9BE%35(be^J+- po:darbv11t
patrokšņot/HDB1357Jhdb!+&j- po:darbv22t
pažulgt/HDB2358-J po:darbv15t
percipēt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv24t
piediet/IB^35%JA- po:darbv14t
piedzirdināt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darbv31t
pielīņāt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv21t
piemest/HEB0458Jjheb)$-* po:darbv11t
piepīt/9EB%35^J(eb+-* po:darbv11t
pieplūst/FEB2458J- po:darbv15t
piesārtis/-6
piesviest/8EB045J9- po:darbv14t
piešķīt/9EB%35^Jeb)+-* po:darbv11t
pietrīt/9BE%35(be^J+- po:darbv11t
piezākāt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv21t
plūkāt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv21t
plunkšķēt/FDB2357J- po:darbv33t
pussagruvis/6
rūkt/9EB0358J(eb)+-& po:darbv13t
sadāvāt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv21t
safolklorizēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
sagrābstīt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darb32t
salūgt/8EB035J9- po:darbv14t
samūrēt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv24t
sapīt/9EB%35^J(eb+-* po:darbv11t
saplakt/FDB0358J- po:darbv13t
sariest/7HDC135hdcJ-& po:darbv14t
sastigt/FDB0358J- po:darbv12t
satikt/FDB0358Jjfdb+-&1* po:darbv13t
satīt/9EB%35^J(eb+-* po:darbv11t
saubagot/HDB1357Jhdb!+&j- po:darbv22t
skābēt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv24t
sliet/8AEB035aebJ)+-* po:darbv14t
svārstīt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darb32t
šaut/8EB135(ebJ9+*j- po:darbv14t
tīt/9EB%35^J(eb+-* po:darbv11t
uzbiedēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
uzbļaut/8EB135J9- po:darbv14t
uzdiet/IB^35%JA- po:darbv14t
uzklaigāt/HDB1357J- po:darbv21t
uzķerstīt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darb32t
uzpīt/9EB%35^J(eb+-* po:darbv11t
uzraut/8EB135ebJ9(+*- po:darbv14t
uzrobežot/HDB1357J- po:darbv22t
uzstīvināt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darbv31t
uztrīt/9BE%35^(beJ+- po:darbv11t
vākt/8EB035ebJ9()+-& po:darbv14t
vērot/HDB1357Jhdb!+&j- po:darbv22t
zibeņot/HDB1357Jhdb!+&j- po:darbv22t
